Washington statutes.
RCW 28C.18.130

Industry skill panels—Grants—Role.

(1) Subject to funding provided for the purposes of this section, the board, in consultation with the state board for community and technical colleges, the department of commerce, and the employment security department, shall allocate grants on a competitive basis to establish and support industry skill panels.

(2) Eligible applicants for the grants allocated under this section include, but are not limited to, workforce development councils, community and technical colleges, economic development councils, private career schools, chambers of commerce, trade associations, and apprenticeship councils.

(3) Entities applying for a grant under this section shall provide an employer match of at least twenty-five percent to be eligible. The local match may include in-kind services.

(4) It shall be the role of industry skill panels funded under this chapter to enable businesses in the industry to address workforce skill needs. Industry skill panels shall identify workforce strategies to meet the needs in order to benefit employers and workers across the industry. Examples of strategies include, but are not limited to: Developing career guidance materials; producing or updating skill standards and curricula; designing training programs and courses; developing technical assessments and certifications; arranging employer mentoring, tutoring, and internships; identifying private sector assistance in providing faculty or equipment to training providers; and organizing industry conferences disseminating best practices. The products and services of particular skill panels shall depend upon the needs of the industry.

[ 2023 c 470 s 2010; 2008 c 103 s 3.]

NOTES:

Explanatory statement—2023 c 470: See note following RCW 10.99.030.

Findings—Intent—2008 c 103: See note following RCW 28C.18.010.